North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12.1 Criminal Code
CHAPTER 12.1-31.2 Disorderly Conduct Restraining Order

12.1-31.2-01.
Disorderly conduct restraining order — Penalty.

“Disorderly conduct” means intrusive or unwanted acts, words, or gestures that are intended to adversely affect the safety, security, or privacy of another person. For the purposes of this section, disorderly conduct includes human trafficking or attempted human trafficking as defined in this title. Disorderly conduct does not include constitutionally protected activity.

A person who is a victim of disorderly conduct or the parent or guardian of a minor who is a victim of disorderly conduct may seek a disorderly conduct restraining order from any court of competent jurisdiction in the manner provided in this section.

A petition for relief must allege facts sufficient to show the name of the alleged victim, the name of the individual engaging in the disorderly conduct, and that the individual engaged in disorderly conduct. An affidavit made under oath stating the specific facts and circumstances supporting the relief sought must accompany the petition.

If the petition for relief alleges reasonable grounds to believe that an individual has engaged in disorderly conduct, the court, pending a full hearing, may grant a temporary disorderly conduct restraining order ordering the individual to cease or avoid the disorderly conduct or to have no contact with the person requesting the order. A temporary restraining order may be entered only against the individual named in the petition. The court may issue the temporary restraining order without giving notice to the respondent. Unless otherwise terminated by the court, the temporary restraining order is in effect until a restraining order issued under subsection 5 is served.

The court may grant a disorderly conduct restraining order ordering the respondent to cease or avoid the disorderly conduct or to have no contact with the applicant if:

A person files a petition under subsection 3;

The sheriff serves the respondent with a copy of the temporary restraining order issued under subsection 4 and with notice of the time and place of the hearing;

The court sets a hearing for not later than fourteen days after issuance of the temporary restraining order or at a later date if good cause is shown; and

The court finds after the hearing that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the respondent has engaged in disorderly conduct. If a person claims to have been engaged in a constitutionally protected activity, the court shall determine the validity of the claim as a matter of law and, if found valid, shall exclude evidence of the activity.

A restraining order may be issued only against the individual named in the petition. Relief granted by the restraining order may not exceed a period of two years. The restraining order may be served on the respondent by publication pursuant to rule 4 of the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.

A disorderly conduct restraining order must contain a conspicuous notice to the respondent providing:

The specific conduct that constitutes a violation of the order;

Notice that violation of the restraining order is a class A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment of up to three hundred sixty days or a fine of up to three thousand dollars or both; and

Notice that a peace officer may arrest the respondent without a warrant and take the respondent into custody if the peace officer has probable cause to believe the respondent has violated an order issued under this section.

If the respondent knows of an order issued under subsection 4 or 5, violation of the order is a class A misdemeanor. If the existence of an order issued under subsection 3 or 4 can be verified by a peace officer, the officer, without a warrant, may arrest and take into custody an individual whom the peace officer has probable cause to believe has violated the order.

Whenever a restraining order is issued, extended, modified, or terminated under this section, the court shall transmit the order electronically to the bureau. Unless the order is a temporary order under subsection 4, the bureau shall enter the order electronically in the national crime information center database provided by the federal bureau of investigation, or its successor agency. The sheriff of the county in which the order was issued shall maintain and respond to inquiries regarding the order in the national crime information center database provided by the federal bureau of investigation, or its successor agency, pursuant to bureau and federal requirements. Whenever a restraining order is issued, the clerk of court shall forward a copy of the order to the local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the residence of the protected party by the close of business on the day the restraining order is issued. Once the bureau, after consultation with the state court administrator, determines and implements an electronic method to notify the sheriff of the county that issued the order, the clerk of court’s requirement to forward the order to a law enforcement agency will be satisfied.

Notwithstanding subsection 5 of section 11-16-05, a state’s attorney may advise and assist any person in the preparation of documents necessary to secure a restraining order under this section.

Fees for filing and service of process may not be charged to the petitioner in any proceeding seeking relief due to domestic violence under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 125, § 2; 1995, ch. 133, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 137, § 1; 2015, ch. 112, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 107, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 54, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 114, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Domestic violence protective orders, see N.D.C.C. ch. 14-07.1.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

12.1-31.2-02.
Order prohibiting contact.

If an individual who is charged with or arrested for a crime of violence or threat of violence, stalking, harassment, or a sex offense is released from custody before arraignment or trial, the court authorizing the release of the individual shall consider and may issue an order prohibiting the individual from having contact with the victim. The order must contain the court’s directives and must inform the individual that any violation of the order constitutes a criminal offense. The state’s attorney shall provide a copy of the order to the victim. The court shall determine at the time of the individual’s arraignment whether an order issued pursuant to this section will be extended. If the court issues an order pursuant to this section before the time the individual is charged, the order expires at the individual’s arraignment or within seventy-two hours of issuance if charges against the individual are not filed.

If the court has probable cause to believe that the individual charged or arrested is likely to use, display, or threaten to use a firearm or dangerous weapon as defined in section 12.1-01-04 in any further act of violence, the court shall require that the individual surrender for safekeeping any firearm or specified dangerous weapon in or subject to the individual’s immediate possession or control, to the sheriff of the county or chief of police of the city in which the individual resides.

Whenever an order prohibiting contact is issued, modified, extended, or terminated under this section, the clerk of court shall forward a copy of the order within one business day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order, the law enforcement agency shall enter the order in the central warrant information system and the national crime information center database provided by the federal bureau of investigation, or its successor agency.

Once the bureau, after consultation with the state court administrator, determines and implements a method to transmit electronically to the bureau an order prohibiting contact, the court electronically shall send the full text of the order as issued, modified, extended, or terminated in accordance with this section and any data fields identified by the bureau. This electronic submission will fulfill the law enforcement agency’s requirement to enter the order in the central warrant information system, but will not fulfill its requirement to enter, maintain, and respond to inquiries regarding the order in the national crime information center database provided by the federal bureau of investigation, or its successor agency.

Once the bureau, after consultation with the state court administrator, determines and implements an electronic method to notify law enforcement about the order, the clerk of court’s requirement to forward the order to the law enforcement agency will be satisfied.

Once the bureau, after consultation with the director of state radio, determines and implements a method to enter the order into the national crime information center database provided by the federal bureau of investigation, or its successor agency, the bureau shall enter the order electronically in the national crime information center database provided by the federal bureau of investigation, or its successor agency. This electronic entry will fulfill the law enforcement agency’s requirement to enter the order in the national crime information center database provided by the federal bureau of investigation, or its successor agency, but will not fulfill its requirement to maintain and respond to inquiries regarding the order in the national crime information center database provided by the federal bureau of investigation, or its successor agency.

An individual who violates a court order issued under this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A law enforcement officer shall arrest an individual without a warrant if the officer determines there is probable cause that the individual has committed the offense of violating an order prohibiting contact under this section, whether or not the violation was committed in the presence of the officer. A law enforcement officer who acts in good faith on probable cause and without malice is immune from any civil or criminal liability for making an arrest under this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 134, § 1; 2017, ch. 107, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.